Georgia, session 2025_26, HB334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Sickle Cell Disease Protection Act."
SECTION 2.
Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
medical assistance generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"49-4-159.5.
(a) The department shall conduct an annual review of all medications, forms of treatment,
and services that are eligible for coverage under the Medicaid program for Medicaid
H. B. 334
- 1 -

LC 57 0194
recipients with a diagnosis of sickle cell disease. The purpose of the annual review shall
be to determine if the available covered medications, treatments, and services are adequate
to meet the needs of Medicaid recipients with a diagnosis of sickle cell disease, and
whether the department should seek to add additional medications, treatments, or services.
(b) When conducting the annual review required by this Code section, the department shall
solicit and consider input from the general public, with specific emphasis on attempting to
receive input from persons or groups with knowledge and experience in the area of sickle
cell disease treatment.
(c) On or before January 15 of each year, the department shall submit a report to the
presiding officers of each house of the General Assembly, who shall forward a copy of the
report to the chairperson or chairpersons of the appropriate standing committee or
committees in each house that details the department's findings from the annual review
required by this Code section, as well as any recommendations based upon such findings.
The department shall publish the annual report required by this subsection to its public
website."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 334
- 2 -